en: Motorcycles & Scooters
xx: Motorcycles & Scooters
cs: Motocykly a skútry
da: Motorcykler og scootere
de: Motorräder & -roller
es: Motocicletas y escúteres
fr: Motos et scooters
it: Motocicli e scooter
ja: バイク・スクーター
nl: Motorfietsen en scooters
no: Motorsykler\, scootere og mopeder
pl: Motocykle i skutery
pt: Motocicletas e scooters
ru: Мотоциклы и скутеры
sv: Motorcyklar och mopeder
tr: Motosikletler ve Mobiletler

en: Off-Road and All-Terrain Vehicles
xx: Off-Road and All-Terrain Vehicles
cs: Terénní a offroad vozidla
da: Terrænkøretøjer
de: Gelände- & Allradfahrzeuge
es: Vehículos TT y UTV
fr: Véhicules tout-terrain et quads
it: Veicoli fuoristrada
ja: オフロード車・全地形車
nl: Terreinwagens en quads
no: Terrengkjøretøy
pl: Pojazdy terenowe i quady
pt: Veículos off-road e all-terrain
ru: Моторные транспортные средства повышенной проходимости
sv: Offroad- och terrängfordon
tr: Yol Dışı ve Arazi Tipi Araçlar

en: ATVs & UTVs
xx: ATVs & UTVs
cs: Čtyřkolky ATV a UTV
da: ATV'er og UTV'er
de: Quads
es: ATV y UTV
fr: Véhicules tout-terrain et véhicules utilitaires tout-terrain
it: ATV e UTV
ja: ATV・UTV
nl: ATV's en UTV's
no: ATV-er og UTV-er
pl: Quady i pojazdy wielozadaniowe
pt: Quadriciclos
ru: Мотовездеходы ATV и UTV
sv: ATV- och UTV-fordon
tr: ATV'ler ve UTV'ler

en: Go Karts & Dune Buggies
xx: Go Karts & Dune Buggies
cs: Motokáry a buginy
da: Gocarts og strandbuggier
de: Go-Karts
es: Karts y buggies de playa
fr: Karts et buggys
it: Go-kart e dune buggy
ja: ゴーカート・バギーカー
nl: Gocarts en duinbuggy's
no: Gokarter og strandbuggier
pl: Gokarty i pojazdy typu buggy
pt: Karts e bugues
ru: Багги и карты
sv: Go-karts & sandloppor
tr: Gokartlar ve Kumsal Arabaları

en: Recreational Vehicles
xx: Recreational Vehicles
cs: Obytné vozy
da: Fritidskøretøjer
de: Wohnmobile
es: Vehículos recreativos
fr: Véhicules de loisirs
it: Camper
ja: キャンピングカー
nl: Camperbusjes
no: Bobiler
pl: Pojazdy kempingowe
pt: Veículos recreacionais
ru: Жилые автофургоны
sv: Nöjesfordon
tr: Karavanlar

en: Snowmobiles
xx: Snowmobiles
cs: Sněžné skútry
da: Snescootere
de: Schneemobile
es: Motos de nieve
fr: Motoneiges
it: Motoslitte
ja: スノーモービル
nl: Sneeuwmobielen
no: Snøscootere
pl: Skutery śnieżne
pt: Veículos para neve
ru: Снегоходы
sv: Snöskotrar
tr: Kar Arabaları

en: Watercraft
xx: Watercraft
cs: Plavidla
da: Vandfartøjer
de: Wasserfahrzeuge
es: Embarcaciones
fr: Bateaux
it: Imbarcazioni
ja: 船舶
nl: Vaartuigen
no: Fartøy
pl: Jednostki pływające
pt: Embarcação
ru: Суда
sv: Vattenfarkoster
tr: Jetski

en: Motor Boats
xx: Motor Boats
cs: Motorové čluny
da: Motorbåde
de: Motorboote
es: Barcos a motor
fr: Bateaux à moteur
it: Motoscafi
ja: モーターボート
nl: Motorboten
no: Motorbåter
pl: Łodzie motorowe
pt: Barcos a motor
ru: Моторные лодки
sv: Motorbåtar
tr: Motorlu Tekneler

en: Personal Watercraft
xx: Personal Watercraft
cs: Vodní skútry
da: Vandscootere
de: Jetski
es: Embarcaciones personal
fr: Scooters des mers
it: Acqua scooter
ja: 水上バイク
nl: Watervoertuigen voor persoonlijk gebruik
no: Vannscootere
pl: Skutery wodne
pt: Embarcação pessoal
ru: Частные суда
sv: Vattenskotrar
tr: Kişisel Jetski

en: Sailboats
xx: Sailboats
cs: Plachetnice
da: Sejlbåde
de: Segelboote
es: Veleros
fr: Voiliers
it: Barche a vela
ja: 帆船
nl: Zeilboten
no: Seilbåter
pl: Łodzie żaglowe
pt: Veleiros
ru: Парусные суда
sv: Segelbåtar
tr: Yelkenliler

en: Yachts
xx: Yachts
cs: Jachty
da: Yachts
de: Yachten
es: Yates
fr: Yachts
it: Yacht
ja: ヨット
nl: Jachtschepen
no: Yachter/fritidsbåter
pl: Jachty
pt: Iates
ru: Яхты
sv: Lustjakter
tr: Yatlar

en: Office Supplies, Office supplies
xx: Office Supplies
cs: Kancelářské potřeby
da: Kontorforsyning
de: Bürobedarf
es: Material de oficina, Suministros de oficina
fr: Fournitures de bureau
it: Forniture per ufficio
ja: オフィス用品
nl: Kantoorartikelen
no: Kontorrekvisita
pl: Artykuły biurowe
pt: Materiais de escritório
ru: Канцелярские товары
sv: Kontorsmaterial
tr: Büro Malzemeleri

en: Book Accessories
xx: Book Accessories
cs: Doplňky ke knihám
da: Bøger – tilbehør
de: Bücherzubehör
es: Accesorios para libros
fr: Accessoires pour livres
it: Accessori per libri
ja: 書籍関連用品
nl: Boekaccessoires
no: Boktilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do książek
pt: Acessórios para livros
ru: Принадлежности для книг
sv: Boktillbehör
tr: Kitap Aksesuarları

en: Book Covers
xx: Book Covers
cs: Obaly na knihy
da: Bogomslag
de: Bucheinbände
es: Cubiertas para libros
fr: Couvertures de livres
it: Copertine per libri
ja: ブックカバー
nl: Boekomslagen
no: Bokomslag
pl: Okładki do książek
pt: Capas de livros
ru: Обложки для книг
sv: Bokomslag
tr: Kitap Kapakları

en: Book Lights
xx: Book Lights
cs: Lampičky na čtení
da: Bøger – læselamper
de: Leselampen
es: Luces de lectura
fr: Lampes de lecture
it: Lampade da lettura
ja: 読書灯
nl: Boekenlampjes
no: Boklys
pl: Lampki do czytania
pt: Luminárias para leitura
ru: Лампы для книг
sv: Läslampor
tr: Kitap Okuma Lambaları

en: Book Stands & Rests
xx: Book Stands & Rests
cs: Stojany na knihy
da: Bogholdere
de: Buchständer & -stützen
es: Soportes y atriles para libros
fr: Porte-livres
it: Leggii per libri
ja: ブックスタンド・ブックレスト
nl: Boekstandaarden en -steunen
no: Bokstativer og -holdere
pl: Pulpity i podpórki do czytania
pt: Suportes e descansos para livros
ru: Подставки и упоры для книг
sv: Bokstöd och bokställ
tr: Kitap Dayanakları ve Rahleler

en: Bookmarks
xx: Bookmarks
cs: Záložky
da: Bogmærker
de: Lesezeichen
es: Marcapáginas
fr: Marque-pages
it: Segnalibri
ja: しおり
nl: Bladwijzers
no: Bokmerker
pl: Zakładki
pt: Marcadores de livros
ru: Закладки
sv: Bokmärken
tr: Ayraçlar

en: Desk Pads & Blotters
xx: Desk Pads & Blotters
cs: Stolní podložky
da: Skriveunderlag
de: Schreibtischunterlagen
es: Secafirmas y protectores de escritorio
fr: Sous-mains
it: Cuscinetti e tamponi assorbenti per scrivanie
ja: デスクマット
nl: Bureauonderleggers en vloeibladen
no: Skriveunderlag og trekkpapir
pl: Podkładki na biurko
pt: Mata-borrões para escrivaninhas
ru: Настольные коврики
sv: Skrivbordsunderlägg och läskpapper
tr: Sümenler

en: Filing & Organization
xx: Filing & Organization
cs: Třídění a uspořádání dokumentů
da: Arkivering og organisering
de: Ablage & Organisation
es: Clasificación y organización
fr: Classement et organisation
it: Archiviazione e organizzazione
ja: ファイル・バインダー
nl: Archiveren en indelen
no: Arkivering og organisering
pl: Sortowanie i utrzymanie porządku
pt: Arquivamento e organização
ru: Товары для хранения документов и архивов
sv: Arkiv och organisering
tr: Dosyalama ve Organizasyon

en: Address Books
xx: Address Books
cs: Adresáře
da: Adressebøger
de: Adressbücher
es: Libretas de direcciones
fr: Carnets d'adresses
it: Rubriche
ja: アドレス帳
nl: Adresboeken
no: Adressebøker
pl: Książki adresowe
pt: Agendas de endereços
ru: Адресные книги
sv: Adressböcker
tr: Adres Defterleri